Massachusetts, session 194th, H214.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 118 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the fourth paragraph and inserting in place
thereof the following paragraph:--
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the payment standards for
monthly benefits for the program not including the rental allowance shall be increased effective
July first of each year beginning with July 1, 2025 by 20 percent above the payment standard in
effect in the previous fiscal year until the payment standard for the household size equals 50
percent of the federal poverty level for the household size; provided further, that once the
payment standard for the household size equals 50 percent of the federal poverty level for the
household size, the payment standard shall be increased effective July first of each year in order
that the payment standard shall be no less than 50 percent of the poverty level for the household
size as determined by the federal Department of Health and Human Services; provided further,
of 2

that the need standard and the payment amounts shall be further increased by the amount of a
clothing allowance in the month for which it is paid and by the rental allowance for households
incurring a rent or mortgage expense and not residing in public or subsidized housing.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of chapter 117A of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting after the first paragraph the following new paragraph:-
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the payment standards for
monthly benefits for the program shall be increased effective July first of each year beginning
with July 1, 2025 by 20 percent above the payment standard in effect in the previous fiscal year
until the payment standard for the household size equals 50 percent of the federal poverty level
for the household size; provided further, that once the payment standard for the household size
equals 50 percent of the federal poverty level for the household size, the payment standard shall
be increased effective July first of each year in order that the payment standard shall be no less
than 50 percent of the poverty level for the household size as determined by the federal
Department of Health and Human Services.
of 2